Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-10,139.09
Legislative intent to appropriate funds.

It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate funds to the department necessary to administer the Hunger-Free Schools Act for any school that does not receive funds from the Hunger-Free Schools Cash Fund.

Laws 2026, LB966, § 9.
July 18, 2026